Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1517
Cigarette tax division; enforcement of sections.

In order to effectuate the purposes of sections 59-1501 to 59-1518 it shall be the duty of the division to carry out the enforcement provisions of sections 59-1501 to 59-1518. In accordance with the laws of this state the division may, within the limits of available appropriations, employ and fix the duties and compensation of such inspectors and other personnel necessary to carry out the provisions of sections 59-1501 to 59-1518.

Laws 1965, c. 364, § 17, p. 1193.